Utah statutes.
17B-2a-101.   Title.

(1)  This chapter is known as "Provisions Applicable to Different Types of Local Districts."

(2)  This part is known as the "Cemetery Maintenance District Act."



Enacted by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

